Arkansas, session 2025, HB1483.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-18-201(e)(1), concerning contracts
between public school districts and adult education programs, is amended to
read as follows:
(e)(1) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a public school district
from continuing with an adult education program to provide educational
services to sixteen-year-olds and seventeen-year-olds enrolled in the public
school district if a contract is negotiated between the public school
district and the adult education program that includes:
(A)(i) Financial considerations for serving the students
enrolled in the public school districts district.
(ii) A public school district may use available
state funds, including without limitation state foundation funding aid under
§ 6-20-2305, to pay for an adult education program, including without
limitation a GED program, with which the public school district contracts;
and
*TNL077*
03-18-2025 10:40:53 TNL077

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1483
(B) Accountability measures to ensure monitoring of
student progress and attendance.

/s/Gramlich
































03-18-2025 10:40:53 TNL077